test/src/morphology/V-laxanasj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - лаханась: # Verb 'to tell' Type 4-A - partial paradigm
     лаханась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: лаханадмʼ
     лаханась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: лаханан
     лаханась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: лахана
     лаханась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: лахананиʼ
     лаханась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: лаханадиʼ
     лаханась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: лаханаӈахаʼ
     лаханась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: лаханаваˮ
     лаханась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: лаханадаˮ
     лаханась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: лаханаˮ
     лаханась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: лаханадамзь
     лаханась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: лахананась
     лаханась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: лаханась
     лаханась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: лахананинзь
     лаханась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: лаханадинзь
     лаханась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: лаханаӈаханзь
     лаханась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: лаханаваць
     лаханась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: лаханадаць
     лаханась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: лаханаць
     
     лаханась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: лаханаӈгудмʼ
     лаханась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: лаханаӈгун
     лаханась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: лаханаӈгу
     лаханась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: лаханаӈгуниʼ
     лаханась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: лаханаӈгудиʼ
     лаханась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: лаханаӈгухуʼ   
     лаханась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: лаханаӈгуваˮ
     лаханась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: лаханаӈгудаˮ
     лаханась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: лаханаӈгуˮ
          
     лаханась+V+IV+Hort+ScSg1: лаханахадмʼ
     лаханась+V+IV+Imprt+ScSg2: лаханˮ
     лаханась+V+IV+Opt+ScSg3: лаханая
     лаханась+V+IV+Hort+ScDu1: лаханаханиʼ
     лаханась+V+IV+Imprt+ScDu2: лаханадиʼ
     лаханась+V+IV+Opt+ScDu3: лаханаяхаʼ
     лаханась+V+IV+Hort+ScPl1: лаханахаваˮ
     лаханась+V+IV+Imprt+ScPl2: лаханадаˮ
     лаханась+V+IV+Opt+ScPl3: лаханаяˮ
     лаханась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1: лаханаидмʼ
     лаханась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2: лаханаин
     лаханась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3: лаханаи
     лаханась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1: лаханаиниʼ
     лаханась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2: лаханаидиʼ
     лаханась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3: лаханаихиʼ
     лаханась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1: лаханаиваˮ
     лаханась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2: лаханаидаˮ
     лаханась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3: лаханаиˮ
     лаханась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1: лаханаидамзь
     лаханась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2: лаханаинась
     лаханась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3: лаханаись
     лаханась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1: лаханаининзь
     лаханась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2: лаханаидинзь
     лаханась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3: лаханаихинзь
     лаханась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1: лаханаиваць
     лаханась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2: лаханаидаць
     лаханась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3: лаханаиць  

     лаханась+V+IV+InfImprf: лаханава  
     лаханась+V+IV+InfPrf: лаханаˮма  
     лаханась+V+IV+PrcImprf: лаханана
     лаханась+V+IV+PrcPrf: лаханавы
     лаханась+V+IV+PrcFut: лаханавнда   
     лаханась+V+IV+PrcNeg: лаханавдавэй
     лаханась+V+IV+Ger: лаханась 
     лаханась+V+IV+GerFin: лаханаванзь      
     лаханась+V+IV+Subord+Abs: лаханабˮ
     лаханась+V+IV+Evas+Abs: лаханавоӈгад
     лаханась+V+IV+ConNeg: лаханˮ
     лаханась+V+IV+Fut+ConNeg: лаханаӈгуˮ
